Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3531
Certificate of licensure; certificate of authorization; renewal; form; contents; notice; fee; continuing education; authorized.

(1) Certificates of licensure and certificates of authorization shall expire on a date established by the board and shall become invalid after that date unless renewed. The board shall notify every person licensed under the Geologists Regulation Act and every organization holding a certificate of authorization under the act of the date of the expiration of the certificate of licensure or certificate of authorization and the amount of the fee required for renewal. The notice shall be sent to the licensee or organization at the last-known address on file with the board at least one month in advance of the date of the expiration. Renewal may be effected at any time prior to or during the period established by the board upon application pursuant to this section and payment of a renewal fee. The fee shall not exceed two hundred dollars per year. Renewal of an expired certificate may be effected under rules and regulations of the board regarding requirements for reexamination and for penalty fees. The board may adopt a program of continuing education as a requirement for renewal for individual licensees.

(2) An applicant for renewal of a certificate of licensure or certificate of authorization shall apply in a method prescribed by the board. The application shall contain statements made under oath showing the applicant's fitness to maintain licensure, including felony convictions in any jurisdiction, convictions involving moral turpitude in any jurisdiction, and suspension or revocation of a professional license in any other jurisdiction. The board shall review the application for renewal. If the board takes no action, the license shall be renewed. The board may deny renewal if it determines the applicant does not meet the requirements for licensure or renewal.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 78;

Laws 2013, LB91, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 26.